Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-147
County, when liable.

Even though a poor person may be eligible for general assistance, the county board shall have no liability to such person until the county board or the person to whom it has delegated responsibility for administration of general assistance shall have passed upon a written application for assistance or shall have failed to act upon the written application within the appropriate time prescribed in section 68-133. If a poor person is incapable, for any cause, of completing a written application for assistance, it may be completed by another acting in the interest of such poor person.

Laws 1983, LB 604, § 17.